Oklahoma, session 2025, SB14.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Privacy and


Conscience Protection Act”.





Req. No. 30 Page 1


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 25 O.S. 2021, Section 1101, as


amended by Section 3, Chapter 365, O.S.L. 2024 (25 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 1101), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1101. A. This act Section 1101 et seq. of this title


provides for exclusive remedies within the state of the policies for


individuals alleging discrimination in employment on the basis of


race, color, national origin, sex, religion, creed, age, disability


or, genetic information, or disclosure of medical privacy.


B. This act Section 1101 et seq. of this title shall be


construed according to the fair import of its terms to further the


general purposes stated in this section and the special purposes of


the particular provision involved.


C. Any policy, program, or statute that prohibits sex


discrimination shall be construed to forbid unfair treatment of


females or males in relation to similarly situated members of the


opposite sex. The state or its political subdivisions shall not be


prohibited from establishing distinctions between sexes when such


distinctions are substantially related to an important government


objective, including, but not limited to, biology, privacy, safety,


or fairness.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 191.1 of Title 40, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:



Req. No. 30 Page 2


A. Any public or private employer operating in this state who


requires an employee or contractor to participate in vaccination or


immunization for COVID-19, as defined in Section 111 of Title 76 of


the Oklahoma Statutes, any variant, or future variants thereof as


part of an employer’s policy, whether written or verbal, shall allow


for a privacy exemption for an employee or contractor to refuse


disclosure of his or her vaccination or immunization status. The


requirement of this subsection shall not be required of an employee


who can provide proof of natural immunity by presenting a positive


antibody test to his or her employer.


B. Every employee or contractor employed by a public or private


employer operating in this state shall be provided a certification


of disclosure exemption, which shall release the employee or


contractor from disclosing his or her vaccination or immunization


status due to an employer-mandated policy or regulation, whether


written or verbal, that involves or governs the vaccination or


immunization status for COVID-19, any variant, or future variants


thereof for employees or contractors. The certification of


disclosure exemption provided to an employee or contractor by the


employer, as required by this section, shall meet the following


requirements:


1. Upon adoption of any policy or regulation by a public or


private employer operating in this state, the employer shall provide


immediate notice to all employees or contractors of the policy

Req. No. 30 Page 3


adopted by the employer. Such notice shall include a certification


of disclosure exemption for the employee or contractor. An employee


seeking to refuse disclosure shall complete the employer-provided


certification of disclosure exemption;


2. Upon receipt of the certification of disclosure exemption,


the employee or contractor shall be given thirty (30) calendar days


to complete and submit the certification to the employer;


3. Upon submission of the completed certification of disclosure


exemption by the employee or contractor, the employer shall accept,


without question, the certification of exemption and shall sign the


document acknowledging receipt;


4. Upon submission of the completed certification of disclosure


exemption, the employer shall not disclose employees or contractors


who refused to disclose their vaccination or immunization statuses


for COVID-19, any variant, or future variants thereof; and


5. All public or private employers operating in this state


shall maintain a signed copy of an employee’s or contractor’s


completed certification of disclosure exemption in the employee’s or


contractor’s employment file and shall provide a signed copy to the


employee or contractor upon request.


C. Any policy or regulation adopted by an employer to implement


the provisions of this section shall not:





Req. No. 30 Page 4


1. Disclose an employee’s or contractor’s vaccination or


immunization status for COVID-19, any variant, or future variants


thereof;


2. Provide incentives, bonuses, or any other reward for


disclosing an employee’s or contractor’s vaccination or immunization


status for COVID-19, any variant, or future variants thereof;


3. Discriminate against an employee or contactor due to his or


her refusal to disclose his or her vaccination or immunization


status for COVID-19, any variant, or future variants thereof.


Discrimination includes, but is not limited to, harassment,


different treatment, denial of benefits, or retaliation against an


employee or contractor;


4. Terminate, discipline, deny employment benefits to, or


otherwise penalize an employee or contractor by a reduction in pay


or benefits based on the employee’s refusal to disclose vaccination


or immunization status for COVID-19, any variant, or future variants


thereof;


5. Segregate employees or contractors based on vaccination or


immunization status for COVID-19, any variant, or future variants


thereof; or


6. Require an employee or contractor to wear or display any


insignia or mark, or otherwise directly or indirectly disclose his


or her refusal to disclose vaccination or immunization status for


COVID-19, any variant, or future variants thereof.

Req. No. 30 Page 5


An employer may offer reasonable accommodations for those who


refuse to disclose and provide an exemption from disclosure of


vaccination status. For the purposes of this section, “reasonable


accommodations” shall mean requiring the wearing of a mask when


interacting with or in close proximity to others or requiring


periodic testing not to exceed more than once weekly. Any costs


incurred by the implementation of these accommodations shall be paid


for by the employer.


D. An employee or contractor seeking an exemption from


disclosure of his or her vaccination or immunization status shall


complete the certification of exemption form included in this


subsection and deliver it to his or her employer.


CERTIFICATION OF DISCLOSURE EXEMPTION FOR VACCINATION STATUS


Please read and complete to request an employer exemption for


disclosing immunization or vaccination status.


All entries must be legible or form will be returned. Please print


unless signature is required.




Name (Last, Birth Name of Employer


First, MI) Date


Phone Number


Address County __________________ _____


City Zip



Req. No. 30 Page 6




1. PERSONAL OBJECTION:


I hereby certify that the employer with whom I am affiliated as


an employee or contractor has implemented policies governing


immunization or vaccination requirements that are contrary to my


beliefs, my conscience, and/or my privacy rights. I request an


exemption from disclosing my immunization or vaccination status


pursuant to my relationship with the above-stated employer. [CITE


NEW LAW]



Printed name Signature Date


2. EMPLOYER RECEIPT:


I hereby certify that I have received and documented the


employee’s or contractor’s certification of disclosure exemption


involving the employee’s or contractor’s immunization or vaccination


status. As an agent of the employer, I hereby approve the


employee’s or contractor’s request to be exempt from disclosing his


or her immunization or vaccination status, pursuant to [CITE NEW


LAW].



Printed name Signature Date


ATTENTION: – This form is to be submitted to the employer,


owner, or human resources department.


The employer, owner, or human resources department shall keep a


copy of this form in the employee’s or contractor’s employment file.

Req. No. 30 Page 7


SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 40 O.S. 2021, Section 192, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 192. A. Each and every violation of any provision of


Section 1 of this act 191 of this title shall constitute a


misdemeanor, punishable by a fine in any amount not exceeding One


Hundred Dollars ($100.00).


B. Each and every violation by the employer as provided in


Section 3 of this act shall be under the jurisdiction of the Office


of the Attorney General.


SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-30 MR 12/6/2024 2:49:42 PM



















Req. No. 30 Page 8